Hawaii, session 2026, HB1773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the statewide parking program for persons with disabilities provides individuals with mobility disabilities the ability to travel and park in accessible parking spaces.  However, individuals with a removeable windshield placard that travel to another island or outside the State are often in situations where they need to park in an accessible parking space at a Hawaii airport or port but also take their windshield placard to be used during their travels. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow a person with a removable windshield placard to be issued a disability travel placard that is valid for a limited period to allow use of the removable windshield placard when traveling. SECTION 2.  Chapter 291, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291-     Issuance of a disability travel placard.  (a) The issuing agency shall issue one disability travel placard to an applicant who has a valid removeable windshield placard and presents a completed form, as provided by the issuing agency, along with a copy of the applicant's proof of travel. (b)  The disability travel placard shall expire on the last day of the month following the return date indicated on the proof of travel." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________